Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-958
Noxious weed control fund; authorized; Noxious Weed Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) A noxious weed control fund may be established for each control authority, which fund shall be available for expenses authorized to be paid from such fund, including necessary expenses of the control authority in carrying out its duties and responsibilities under the Noxious Weed Control Act. The weed control superintendent within the county shall (a) ascertain and tabulate each year the approximate amount of land infested with noxious weeds and its location in the county, (b) ascertain and prepare all information required by the county board in the preparation of the county budget, including actual and expected revenue from all sources, cash balances, expenditures, amounts proposed to be expended during the year, and working capital, and (c) transmit such information tabulated by the control authority to the county board not later than June 1 of each year.

(2) The Noxious Weed Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of proceeds raised from fees imposed for the registration of pesticides and earmarked for the fund pursuant to section 2-2634, funds credited or transferred pursuant to sections 2-509, 2-518, and 81-201, any gifts, grants, or donations from any source, and any reimbursement funds for control work done pursuant to subdivision (1)(b)(vi) of section 2-954. An amount from the General Fund may be appropriated annually for the Noxious Weed Control Act. The fund shall be administered and used by the director to maintain the noxious weed control program and for expenses directly related to the program.

(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1965, c. 7, § 7, p. 84;

Laws 1969, c. 13, § 5, p. 159;

Laws 1969, c. 145, § 11, p. 675;

Laws 1987, LB 1, § 4;

Laws 1987, LB 138, § 8;

Laws 1989, LB 49, § 10;

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 35;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1114, § 11;

Laws 1997, LB 269, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 541, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 869, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB657, § 20;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 7;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 1.
March 17, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.